North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-35.2 State Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental Relations

54-35.2-01.
Task force on intergovernmental issues — Membership — Meetings.

The legislative management may appoint task forces on intergovernmental issues assigned by the legislative management based on a study directive of a legislative bill or resolution and may appoint to each task force representatives of political subdivisions, the governor or the governor’s designee, and members of the legislative assembly. The majority of the members of any task force appointed must be members of the legislative assembly. Task force appointees as representatives of political subdivisions may be selected from nominees of the North Dakota league of cities, association of counties, township officers association, recreation and park association, and school boards association.

The legislative management shall designate the chairman and vice chairman and the study directive of each task force.

Each task force shall meet at the call of its chairman.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 654, § 1; 2001, ch. 491, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 75; 2015, ch. 420, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 420, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

54-35.2-02.
Functions and duties.

Each task force on intergovernmental issues shall serve as a forum for the discussion of resolution of issues relating to its study directive.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 654, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, §
76; 2015, ch. 420, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 420, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

54-35.2-02.1.
Local government efficiency planning grants. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 468, § 1.

54-35.2-03.
Staff services.

Each task force on intergovernmental issues may request provision of appropriate staff services from the legislative council.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 654, § 3; 2015, ch. 420, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 420, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

54-35.2-04.
Compensation and expenses.

A member of the task force on intergovernmental issues who is a member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive, from funds available to the task force, compensation per day for each day spent in attendance at task force meetings in the same amount as provided for members of interim committees of the legislative management and reimbursement for travel and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties in the amounts provided by law for other state officers. Members of the task force on intergovernmental issues who represent political subdivisions may be reimbursed for attendance at task force meetings by the organization they represent.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 654, § 4; 1997, ch. 432, § 28; 2009, ch. 482, § 77; 2015, ch. 420, § 4, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 420, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

54-35.2-05.
Reports.

Each task force on intergovernmental issues shall report its findings and recommendations and any proposed legislation necessary to implement the recommendations to the legislative management by the deadline provided by the legislative management when the task force was appointed. A majority of the members of each task force and a majority of the legislative assembly members of each task force must vote in favor of any proposed legislation before the proposed legislation may be recommended to the legislative management.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 654, § 5; 2009, ch. 482, § 78; 2015, ch. 420, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 420, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.